West Virginia, session 2026, HB4054.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 20. DOGS, AND CATS, and other pets. §19-20-20. Keeping vicious dogs pets; humane officers may kill such dogs pets. Except as provided in section twenty-one of this article §19-20-21 of this code, no person shall own, keep, or harbor any dog pet known by him or her to be vicious, dangerous, or in the habit of biting or attacking other persons people, whether or not such dog pet wears a tag or muzzle. Upon satisfactory proof before a circuit court or magistrate that such dog pet is vicious, dangerous, or in the habit of biting or attacking other persons people or other dogs or animals, the judge may authorize the humane officer to cause such dog pet to be killed.